Washington statutes.
RCW 11.135.050

Electronic documents and signatures not required.

(1) This chapter does not require a nontestamentary estate planning document or signature on a nontestamentary estate planning document to be created, generated, sent, communicated, received, stored, or otherwise processed or used by electronic means or in electronic form.

(2) A person is not required to have a nontestamentary estate planning document in electronic form or signed electronically even if the person previously created or signed a nontestamentary estate planning document by electronic means.

(3) A person may not waive the provisions of this section.

[ 2024 c 188 s 6.]